homeworks-ivanin/foma/task2/english.foma
read lexc lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon;

define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s;

define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar Lexicon           .o.
               EInsertion        .o.
               YReplacement      .o.
               Cleanup;
